Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.150.280

Reimbursement for acquisition of approved transportation equipment—Method.

Costs of acquisition of approved transportation equipment purchased prior to September 1, 1982, shall be reimbursed up to one hundred percent of the cost to be reimbursed over the anticipated life of the vehicle, as determined by the state superintendent: PROVIDED, That commencing with the 1980-81 school year, reimbursement shall be at one hundred percent or as close thereto as reasonably possible: PROVIDED FURTHER, That reimbursements for the acquisition of approved transportation equipment received by school districts shall be placed in the transportation vehicle fund for the current or future purchase of approved transportation equipment and for major transportation equipment repairs consistent with rules and regulations authorized in RCW 28A.160.130.

[ 1993 c 111 s 1. Prior: 1990 c 33 s 110; 1990 c 33 s 109; 1981 c 343 s 1; 1981 c 265 s 9; 1981 c 265 s 8; 1977 ex.s. c 359 s 6; 1977 c 80 s 3; 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 60; 1972 ex.s. c 85 s 1; 1971 c 48 s 14; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.41.160; prior: 1965 ex.s. c 154 s 5. Formerly RCW 28A.41.160, 28.41.160.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Severability—1981 c 265: See notes following RCW 28A.160.150.

Effective date—Severability—1977 ex.s. c 359: See notes following RCW 28A.150.200.

Severability—1977 c 80: See note following RCW 28A.160.030.

Severability—1971 c 48: See note following RCW 28A.310.250.

Program of basic education, RCW 28A.150.280 as part of: RCW 28A.150.200.

Transportation vehicle fund—Deposits in—Use—Rules for establishment and use: RCW 28A.160.130.